California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) Application for renewal of a license accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be made on or before its expiration. Applicants for renewal of a license who have not paid the renewal fee by the expiration date of the license shall be assessed a twenty-five dollar ($25) penalty. Failure to pay the renewal fee plus the penalty within 90 days of expiration shall cause a revocation of a license.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18982.

The department shall conduct periodic training for licensed livestock meat inspectors and licensed processing inspectors to maintain and increase their competence in the performance of their official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18983.

Licensed livestock meat inspectors and licensed processing inspectors shall participate in annual training meetings sponsored by the department to maintain and increase their competence in the performance of their official duties. Failure to participate may be a cause to revoke their license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Livestock Meat Inspector License—Custom Livestock Slaughter [18990. - 18991.]

18990.

(a) Each person, before acting as a livestock meat inspector in a livestock custom slaughterhouse, shall apply to the director and shall receive from the director a license after passing an examination and a demonstration that shows the applicant’s ability to understand laws and regulations which pertain to meat inspection and a practical knowledge of all the following:

(1) Conditions which affect adulteration and wholesomeness of livestock and livestock products.

(2) The anatomy of livestock.

(3) Sanitary livestock slaughter and dressing procedures.

(4) Sanitation of the facilities and equipment used in custom livestock slaughterhouses.

(b) Applicants shall not be less than 18 years old.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18991.

(a) A licensed livestock meat inspector, in accordance with regulations adopted hereunder, shall conduct antemortem examination of each animal to be slaughtered in a licensed establishment and shall permit the slaughter of apparently healthy animals and withhold from slaughter all animals suspected, as well as those plainly showing evidence, of a disease. Animals so withheld shall be examined by a department employee who shall order the disposition of the animal pursuant to the regulations adopted hereunder.

(b) The licensed livestock meat inspector shall conduct a postmortem examination and make dispositions of carcasses and parts thereof in accordance with regulations adopted hereunder.

(c) A licensed livestock meat inspector shall conduct a sanitation inspection before the establishment commences operations for the day, and make periodic inspections throughout the day.

(d) The licensed livestock meat inspector shall order the establishment not to begin operations or to cease operations at any time that the establishment sanitation fails to meet the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted thereunder, or at any time any product is not handled, retained, condemned, or disposed of in violation of this chapter or the regulations thereunder.

(e) (1) Passed carcasses and parts of cattle, sheep, swine, and goat shall be stamped by the licensed livestock meat inspector or under his or her supervision with an approved California identification number.

(2) Passed carcasses and parts of fallow deer slaughtered and prepared for transportation or sale shall be stamped with an approved mark of inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Processing Inspector License—Meat Processing Establishment [19000. - 19002.]

19000.

Each person, before acting as a licensed processing inspector in a retail meat processing establishment, shall apply to the department and receive from the department a license after passing an examination and a demonstration that shows the applicant’s ability to understand laws and regulations that pertain to meat inspection and a practical knowledge of all the following:

(a) Conditions that affect adulteration, misbranding, and wholesomeness of livestock and poultry products.

(b) Sanitary meat and poultry processing procedures.

(c) Sanitation of the facilities and the equipment used in retail meat processing establishments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19001.

(a) A licensed processing inspector shall conduct a sanitation inspection before the establishment commences operations for the day, and shall make periodic inspections throughout the day.

(b) The licensed processing inspector shall order the establishment not to begin operations or to cease operations at any time that the establishment sanitation fails to meet the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted thereunder, or at any time any product is not handled, retained, condemned, or disposed of in violation of this chapter or the regulations thereunder.

(c) The licensed processing inspector shall direct the application of the mark of inspection as provided by regulations on products that are inspected by him or her and found to be wholesome, not adulterated, and derived from (1) United States Department of Agriculture inspected carcasses, or (2) fallow deer carcasses at custom livestock slaughterhouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19002.

The department may suspend or revoke the license of a licensed processing inspector for permitting the processing or labeling of products not meeting the requirements provided for in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Licensed Meat Processing and Custom Livestock Slaughter Establishments [19010. - 19017.]

19010.

(a) Each person shall, before operating a meat processing establishment or a custom livestock slaughterhouse, file an application accompanied with an application fee, with the secretary for a license to operate the establishment. The application shall be in the form as the secretary may prescribe.

(b) Subject to Section 19011.5, the application fee for a meat processing establishment or a new, previously unlicensed custom livestock slaughterhouse is five hundred dollars ($500) for a license for one year for each establishment that the applicant desires to operate. Each license shall expire on the last day of the calendar year for which it was issued. The fee shall not be prorated.

(c) The fee for a
 license application submitted upon a change of ownership of an existing, previously licensed custom livestock slaughterhouse shall be based on the number of head of livestock slaughtered by the custom livestock slaughterhouse during the preceding October through September time period, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 19011.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 3.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.

(a) Application for renewal of a license accompanied by a renewal fee shall be made on or before its expiration.

(1) Subject to Section 19011.5, the annual renewal fee for a custom livestock slaughterhouse is:

(A) Five hundred dollars ($500) if the plant slaughtered 1,000 or fewer head of livestock during the preceding October through September time period.

(B) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) if the plant slaughtered between 1,000 and 5,000 head of livestock during the preceding October through September time period.

(C) One thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) if the
 plant slaughtered over 5,000 head of livestock during the preceding October through September time period.

(2) Subject to Section 19011.5, the annual renewal fee for a meat reprocessing establishment is five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) Applicants for renewal who have not paid the renewal fee by the expiration date of the license shall be assessed a penalty of 10 percent of the unpaid balance. Failure to pay the renewal fee plus the penalty within 90 days of expiration shall cause a revocation of a license.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 4.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.5.

If a licensee has two or more licenses in effect at the same meat processing establishment, custom livestock slaughterhouse, place of business, or poultry plant, pursuant to Section 19010, 19011, 19240, 19260, 19280, or 24741, the license fee that is the highest amount shall be paid in full and each additional license fee shall be in an amount that is 50 percent of the fee that would otherwise be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 134, Sec. 3.   (AB 107)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19012.

No person shall operate a licensed establishment performing the functions stated in this chapter unless all livestock and livestock products are inspected for wholesomeness and the facilities are inspected for sanitation by a licensed livestock meat inspector or a licensed processing inspector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19013.

No person shall operate a meat processing establishment unless all livestock and poultry products used in processing and to be sold have been inspected by the United States Department of Agriculture, fallow deer products have been inspected at a custom livestock slaughterhouse, or poultry products have been inspected in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 24951) of Part 1 of Division 12 and the processing of the product is inspected by a licensed processing inspector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19014.

Plant sanitation, sanitary dressing procedures, processing procedures, vehicle equipment, facility standards, and sanitation, including transportation and storage of products, shall follow procedures which may be set forth in regulations or operations manuals adopted by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19015.

Livestock carcasses and parts and livestock and poultry products shall not be packed, repacked, cut up, recut, or sold unless each container or each part or each carcass, whichever is applicable, is marked in a manner which is required by this chapter and the regulations thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19016.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), all custom slaughtered livestock carcasses and parts shall be marked in a manner required by the department to identify the inspected premises and that the products are not for sale.

(2) Fallow deer carcasses and parts thereof intended for transportation or sale shall be marked in a manner required by the department to identify the inspected premises and to show that the products have been inspected under this chapter.

(b) The department shall determine, by regulation, the official design of the marks that are required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19017.

It is unlawful to do any of the following:

(a) Operate an establishment not licensed by the department.

(b) Operate an establishment that is not clean.

(c) Operate an establishment in a manner or under conditions that are not sanitary.

(d) Operate an establishment that does not meet the sanitary building or equipment standards pursuant to the regulations of this chapter.

(e) Operate an establishment in violation of an order of a licensed livestock meat inspector, licensed processing inspector, or a department inspector.

(f) Dispose of condemned and inedible livestock carcasses or parts of livestock products in violation of this chapter or the regulations thereunder.

(g) Misbrand or mislabel livestock and poultry products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Exemptions [19020. - 19023.]

19020.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Owners who slaughter, on their own premises, livestock of their own raising where the meat is not for sale, but used exclusively by the owners, members of the owner’s household, the owner’s employees, and nonpaying guests.

(b) A mobile slaughter operator who provides services to an owner as specified in subdivision (a) where the slaughter occurs on the owner’s premises and the meat is thereafter transported for the owner to an establishment for further processing.

(c) (1) A mobile slaughter operator who provides
 services to an owner of livestock and slaughters multiple livestock from multiple owners, if the slaughter occurs on the premises of one of the owners of the livestock or on the premises of the producer, subject to the following conditions:

(A) Before the slaughter, if
 the livestock slaughtered are cattle, the cattle are inspected pursuant to Section 21051.

(B) After the slaughter, the meat is transported for the owner to an establishment for further processing.

(C) The meat is not for sale, but is used exclusively by the owner, members of the owner’s household, the owner’s employees, and nonpaying guests.

(D) The producer that has mobile slaughter operations conducted on their premises shall register with the department and maintain records pursuant to this chapter.

(E) The
 mobile slaughter operator shall be licensed as a custom livestock slaughter operation with the department pursuant to this chapter.

(F) The mobile slaughter operator shall be licensed as a livestock meat inspector with the department pursuant to this chapter and shall complete annual training as provided by the Meat, Poultry and Egg Safety Branch of the department.

(G) The mobile slaughter operator licensed with the department shall maintain records pursuant to this chapter and the records shall be made available, upon request, to a department inspector, investigator, or peace officer.

(H) The premises or the mobile slaughter facility where slaughter is conducted shall have an adequate sewer, facilities, and potable water.

(2) The exemption in paragraph (1) shall apply to the slaughter of more than one head of livestock on a single premises in a calendar year.

(3) Slaughter activities conducted, including the proper disposition of inedible materials, pursuant to the exemption in paragraph (1) shall comply with all other applicable state and federal environmental and zoning laws.

(4) For purposes of this
 article, the following terms shall apply:

(A) “Livestock” means any cattle, sheep, goat, and swine used for human food.

(B) “Producer”
 means the person who owned and was responsible for feeding and caring for the livestock before its sale and slaughter on the person’s premises.

(d) Persons solely engaged in cutting, wrapping, and otherwise processing farm or custom slaughter livestock or the processing and sale of fresh meats derived from United States Department of Agriculture inspected carcasses, except the curing, smoking, and preparing of cooked or smoked sausages or cooked pork products that are not exempted under subdivision (b) of Section 18814.

(e) Livestock slaughter and meat and poultry processing inspected by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19021.

(a) A mobile slaughter operator performing the service of slaughtering livestock pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19020 shall be
 licensed with the department as both of the following:

(1) A custom livestock slaughter operation pursuant to Sections 19010 and 19022 and is subject to Section 19023. The department shall establish a license fee and a renewal fee to cover costs
 associated with oversight and inspection of mobile slaughter operators. The fees shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs of the department and in no event shall be more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) A livestock meat inspector pursuant to Sections 18980 and 19022 and subject to Section 19023.

(b) (1) The producer of the livestock who conducts multiple slaughter operations on their premise pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19020 shall be registered with the department pursuant to Section 19022 and is subject to Section 19023. The one-time registration fee shall not exceed the regulatory costs of the department and in no event shall be more than one hundred
 dollars ($100).

(2) The producer shall reregister with the department if the producer moves locations or if the operation changes ownership. The reregistration fee shall be the same amount as the registration fee specified in paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 378, Sec. 2.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19022.

(a) A mobile slaughter operator performing the service of slaughtering livestock pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19020 shall file an
 application for a license that shows the names and addresses of the owners of the mobile slaughterer and any other information the secretary may require.

(b) The producer shall file a registration with the department that shows the name and address of every location where the slaughter of livestock will occur.

(c) The registration
 or license shall be filed with the Meat, Poultry and Egg Safety Branch of the department before a mobile slaughter operator may slaughter livestock pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19020.

(d) After notice and hearing, the secretary may cancel the registration of any
 producer or the license of a mobile slaughter operator operating pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19020 for failing to comply with this section or Section 19023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 378, Sec. 3.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19023.

(a) A mobile slaughter operator that slaughters livestock pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19020 shall keep and maintain all of the following records expressly for that purpose for at least
 one year:

(1) The date of slaughter of all livestock.

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of producer of the livestock that are being slaughtered.

(3) The address or other location identifier of
 where the slaughter occurred.

(4) The number of each livestock slaughtered at the address on the date of slaughter.

(5) All ear tag numbers and all identification markings, if available, on all livestock slaughtered, and, if no identification number or marking is present, record “no identification number or marking.”

(6) The name, address, and telephone number of the owner for each livestock slaughtered.

(7) The name and address of the facility that each carcass was transported to for processing.

(b) Every producer that produces livestock that are slaughtered by a mobile slaughter operator pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19020 shall keep and maintain all of the following records for at least one year:

(1) The name, address,
 and telephone number of the buyer.

(2) All ear tag numbers and all other identification 
 markings of all livestock.

(3) The price paid for each livestock.

(4) A purchase receipt for each livestock.

(5) The date of purchase of each
 livestock.

(6) The date of slaughter of each livestock.

(c) All records maintained pursuant to this section shall be available on the demand of any inspector or peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 378, Sec. 4.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Violations and Penalties [19030. - 19039.]

19030.

The director may, after a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 11346.8 of the Government Code, refuse to issue a license or renew a license and may revoke or suspend any license for any violation of or failure to comply with any provision of this chapter or any of the regulations thereunder. However, if the director finds evidence of willful or repeated violations, he or she may immediately suspend the license pending a final disposition of the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19031.

A violation of the provisions of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19032.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter, or any regulation that is issued pursuant to it, is liable civilly for a penalty in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each such violation. If the court finds that the violation of this chapter was a serious violation, or that the violation is a second or subsequent violation, the person is liable civilly for a penalty not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each such violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 25.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19033.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his or her own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he or she believes a violation has occurred, bring an action for civil penalties in the name of the people of this state in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19033.1.

(a) In lieu of any civil action brought pursuant to Section 19032 and in lieu of seeking prosecution pursuant to Section 19031, the secretary may levy an administrative penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon any person for each violation of this chapter.

(b) Before an administrative penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall be given a written notice of the proposed action, including the nature of the violation and the amount of the proposed penalty, and that person shall have the right to request a hearing. The request shall be made within 20 days after the person receives notice of the proposed action. A notice of the proposed action, which
 shall be sent by certified mail to the last-known address of the person charged, shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or if the notice is not accepted at that address. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the department’s evidence and to present evidence on his or her own behalf.

(c) Any person upon whom an administrative penalty is levied may appeal to the secretary, within 20 days of the date of receiving notification of the penalty, as follows:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent and shall state the grounds for the appeal.

(2) Any party, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter, may present written evidence and a written argument to the secretary.

(3) The secretary may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are made.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days prior to the date set therefor. This time requirement may be changed upon agreement between the secretary and the person appealing the penalty.

(5) The secretary shall decide the appeal based on any oral or written arguments, briefs, and evidence received.

(6) The secretary shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of the appeal, or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments. A copy of the secretary’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant.

(7) The secretary may sustain the decision, modify the decision by reducing the amount of the penalty levied, or reverse the decision.

(8) A review of the secretary’s decision may be sought by the person against whom the penalty was levied pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) After completion of the review procedure provided in this section, the secretary may file a certified copy of the department’s final decision that directs payment of an administrative penalty and, if applicable, any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. No fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service
 required in connection with the entry of a judgment pursuant to this section.

(e) Any money that is received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 26.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19034.

In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter, the department may bring an action in superior court and the court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter. Any proceeding under the provisions of this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The department shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss. The court may require such acts or course of conduct as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19035.

It is unlawful for any person to slaughter any livestock or prepare any such livestock products which are appropriate for use as human food at any custom livestock slaughterhouse or retail processing establishment except in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19036.

It is unlawful for any person to do with respect to any livestock which is appropriate for use as human food, any act, while it is being transported or held in storage after the transportation, which is intended to cause or has the effect of causing it to be adulterated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19037.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any provision of the regulations promulgated by the director which are applicable to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19038.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly to represent that an article has been examined by a licensed livestock meat inspector, licensed processing inspector, or department inspector or exempted under this chapter when in fact it has respectively not been so examined or exempted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19039.

It is unlawful for any person to assault, resist, impede, intimidate, or interfere with any person while engaged in the performance of duties under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Disposition of Funds [19040. - 19040.]

19040.

(a) All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to this chapter shall be used for the enforcement of this chapter and shall be for a specific benefit or privilege conferred directly to the payer and such benefit or privilege shall not be provided to those not charged.

(c) Fees shall not exceed the reasonable costs associated with issuing the license or permit, performing investigations, inspections, and audits, enforcing provisions pursuant to the license or permit, and administrative
 enforcement and adjudication thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 28.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Holding, Segregation, and Disposal of Animals Unfit for Human Food Purposes [19051. - 19056.]

19051.

As used in this chapter, animal means livestock as defined in Section 18663 and poultry as defined in Section 24657.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

19052.

If the director determines that any animal raised for the production of any food product is or may be carrying in its body pesticides, poisons, or other deleterious substances, including, but not limited to, veterinary biologicals, antibiotics, pesticides, and heavy metal poisons which may render any food product from such animal injurious to human health, he may order the animal held on the premises where it is found or elsewhere until he has determined that the animal may safely be released for human food purposes. The director may require the segregation of animals held under such an order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

19053.

If the director finds that any animal under a hold order pursuant to this chapter cannot, after treatment or care, be safely used for human food purposes, or contains in its body any such deleterious substance in excess of a tolerance established by the director, the director may after notice to the owner or person in possession of the animal, require that the animal be marked or branded or otherwise disposed of in such a manner as to preclude its use for human food. If the animal is fit for use as pet food the director may permit the animal to be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

19054.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to comply with any order of the director issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

19055.

The director may bring an action in the superior court of any county in which animals subject to a hold order are located to require enforcement of such order. The director shall not be required to allege an inadequate remedy at law or irreparable damage. The court may enjoin violation of the director’s orders and require such other course of action as may be necessary to assure compliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

19056.

The owner of any animal for which a hold or disposal order is issued pursuant to this chapter may seek administrative review of such order in the same manner as is provided in Section 18931. The proceedings for such review shall be as provided in Section 18931. Any hold order under this chapter shall remain in force during such administrative review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Horsemeat and Pet Food [19200. - 19447.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [19200. - 19216.]

19200.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions of this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19201.

“Animals” means burros, cattle, goats, horses, mules, sheep, swine and other large domesticated animals and poultry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19202.

“Bureau” means Bureau of Meat and Poultry Inspection of the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 699, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19203.

“Canned pet food” means any commercially sterile food product packed in hermetically sealed containers and composed of either edible fresh or frozen meat or horsemeat, meat or horsemeat byproducts or fish, or a combination thereof. It may contain cereals, edible accessory food products or edible mineral- or vitamin-containing substances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19204.

“Collection center” means a receiving area for the temporary storage of animal carcasses, packinghouse waste, or other products before transportation to a licensed rendering plant or pet food processor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 393, Sec. 2.   (AB 2612)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19205.

“Dead animal hauler” means any person or company that engages in the business of transporting the carcasses of dead animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 187, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19206.

“Edible” means food fit to be eaten by dogs, cats, or other carnivora.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19207.

“Horsemeat byproducts” means the parts other than horsemeat which have been derived from horses, mules or burros, or any combination of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19208.

“Horsemeat” means the uncooked muscle tissue of horse, mule or burro, or any combination thereof, which is skeletal, with or without the accompanying and overlaying fat, and the portion of sinews, nerves and blood vessels which normally accompany the muscle tissue and which are not separated from it in the process of dressing.

Except where otherwise provided herein, “horsemeat” shall include horsemeat and the horse byproducts as such terms are defined in Sections 19207 and 19208.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19209.

“Inspected horsemeat” means horsemeat produced in a slaughtering establishment under federal, state or state-approved municipal inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19210.

“Meat” means the uncooked muscle tissue of a cow, goat, sheep, swine, or poultry which is skeletal, with or without the accompanying and overlaying fat, and the portion of sinews, nerves and blood vessels which normally accompany the muscle tissue and which are not separated from it in the process of dressing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19210.5.

“Meat byproducts” means the edible parts other than meat which have been derived from cattle, goats, sheep, swine, or poultry or any combination of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19211.

“Pet” means any household animal including but not limited to cats or dogs and other carnivora, whether or not for public exhibition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19212.

“Processed pet food” means a food for pets which has been prepared by heating, drying, semidrying, canning, or by a method of treatment prescribed by regulation of the State Department of Public Health. The term includes special diet, health foods, supplements, treats and candy for pets, but does not include fresh or frozen pet foods subject to the control of the California Department of Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19213.

“Rendering” means all recycling, processing, and conversion of animal and fish materials and carcasses and inedible kitchen grease into fats, oils, proteins, and other products that are used in the animal, poultry, and pet food industries and other industries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 535, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19214.

“Slaughter” means to kill live animals and prepare for consumption for pet food purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 815.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.

“Transporter of inedible kitchen grease” means any person who transports inedible kitchen grease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 535, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19216.

“Inedible kitchen grease” means any fat or used cooking greases and oils obtained from any source.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 699, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Rendering Industry Advisory Board [19218. - 19218.7.]

19218.

(a) There is in state government a Rendering Industry Advisory Board consisting of seven persons, appointed by the secretary, six of whom are licensed under this chapter and are subject to payment of the rendering program licensing fees in accordance with this chapter, including, but not limited to, licensed renderers, dead haulers, and transporters of inedible kitchen grease. The secretary shall appoint one other member to the board who shall be a public member. Any vacancy in the office of a public member of the board shall be filled by appointment by the secretary.

(b) At least one of the six licensee members appointed by the secretary pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have experience and expertise in alternative uses of rendered products, including, but not
 limited to, use as energy, alternative fuels, lubricants, and other nontraditional uses.

(c) The public member appointed by the secretary pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have experience and expertise in one or more of the following:

(1) Water quality.

(2) Publicly owned treatment works and water infrastructure.

(3) Law enforcement.

(d) The members of the board shall receive no salary, but are entitled to payment of necessary traveling expenses in accordance with the Department of Human Resources rules and regulations. These expenses shall be paid out of appropriations made to the department for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19218.1.
